Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.270

Bail bond agent/bail bond recovery agent—Each fugitive an individual contract—Format of contract.

(1) Each fugitive criminal defendant to be recovered will be treated as an individual contract between the bail bond agent and the bail bond recovery agent. A bail bond agent shall provide a bail bond recovery agent a copy of each individual contract. A bail bond recovery agent must carry, in addition to the license issued by the department, a copy of the contract and, if requested, must present a copy of the contract and the license to the fugitive criminal defendant, the owner or manager of the property in which the agent entered in order to locate or apprehend the fugitive, other residents, if any, of the residence in which the agent entered in order to locate or apprehend the fugitive, and to the local law enforcement agency or officer. If presenting a copy of the contract or the license at the time of the request would unduly interfere with the location or apprehension of the fugitive, the agent shall present the copy of the contract or the license within a reasonable period of time after the exigent circumstances expire.

(2) The director, or the director's designee, with the advice of the bail bond industry and associations, law enforcement agencies and associations, and prosecutors' associations shall develop a format for the contract. At a minimum, the contract must include the following:

(a) The name, address, phone number, and license number of the bail bond agency or bail bond agent contracting with the bail bond recovery agent;

(b) The name and license number of the bail bond recovery agent; and

(c) The name, last known address, and phone number of the fugitive.

[ 2004 c 186 s 6.]

NOTES:

Legislative recognition—2004 c 186: See note following RCW 18.185.010.